apertium-es-ast.es.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="acr"/>
<sdef n="predet"/>
<sdef n="detnt"/>
<sdef n="loc"/>
<sdef n="ant"/>
<sdef n="al"/> 
<sdef n="atn"/>
<sdef n="enc"/>
<sdef n="pro"/>
<sdef n="tn"/>
<sdef n="n"/>
<sdef n="np"/>
<sdef n="adj"/>
<sdef n="f"/>
<sdef n="m"/>
<sdef n="mf"/>
<sdef n="sg"/>
<sdef n="pl"/>
<sdef n="adv"/>
<sdef n="preadv"/>
<sdef n="pr"/>
<sdef n="prn"/>
<sdef n="rel"/>
<sdef n="nn"/>
<sdef n="an"/>
<sdef n="ind"/>
<sdef n="itg"/>
<sdef n="det"/>
<sdef n="dem"/>
<sdef n="def"/>
<sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
<sdef n="cnjsub"/>
<sdef n="cnjadv"/>
<sdef n="nt"/>
<sdef n="vbser"/>
<sdef n="vbhaver"/>
<sdef n="vblex"/>
<sdef n="inf"/>
<sdef n="ger"/>
<sdef n="pp"/>
<sdef n="pri"/>
<sdef n="p1"/>
<sdef n="p2"/>
<sdef n="p3"/>
<sdef n="pii"/>
<sdef n="ifi"/>
<sdef n="fti"/>
<sdef n="cni"/>
<sdef n="prs"/>
<sdef n="pis"/>
<sdef n="fts"/>
<sdef n="imp"/>
<sdef n="pos"/>
<sdef n="sp"/>
<sdef n="ref"/>
<sdef n="sup"/>
<sdef n="num"/>
<sdef n="ij"/>
<sdef n="sent"/>
<sdef n="cm"/>
<sdef n="lpar"/>
<sdef n="rpar"/>
<sdef n="lquest"/>
</sdefs>
  <pardefs>

  <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
<re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
    <pardef n="personas">
      <!--
	  <e>
        <re>[A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  -->
      <e>
        <re>[A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  <e>
        <re>[A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][abcdefghijklmnñopqrstuvwzáéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+ [A-ZÁÉÍÓÚ][a-záéíóú]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  
	</pardef>  
    <pardef n="urls">
      <e>
        <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z\-]+([.][a-z\-]+)+)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
        <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	
  <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
<re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="sent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
<re>,</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="cm"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
<re>¿</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
<re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
<re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndole">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>me</l>
        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nos</l>
        <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndose">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndome">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S(1)__sabiéndome">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S__sabiéndoos">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nos</l>
        <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="S(1)__sabiéndose">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>me</l>
        <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nos</l>
        <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>te</l>
        <r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
 <e><par n="personas"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
    <e><par n="emails"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="separ"/></e>
